Hawaii statutes.
[§353F-6] Executive secretary; staff.
The department of public safety shall appoint an executive secretary and
additional staff as necessary to carry out the functions of the commission.
All staff shall be appointed without regard to chapter 76. [L 1993, c 343, pt
of §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next